Hawaii statutes.
[§346-375] Temporary
emergency shelter. (a) In addition to any other duties prescribed by law,
the department shall develop, in consultation with the four counties, a
procedure for identifying locations that shall be used for temporary emergency
shelters for homeless individuals and families. The department shall actively
partner with and monitor the efforts of the counties.

(b) Each county shall be responsible for
partnering with nonprofit organizations to locate, designate, and maintain the
areas that shall be used for temporary emergency shelters. The designated
locations may include private, county, state, and federal lands. [L 2010, c 89,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next